Maryland, session 2025, HB0549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–402.1.
(a) (1) (i) Subject to § 8–406 of this subtitle and where an unexpired lease
for a stated term provides that the landlord may repossess the premises prior to the
expiration of the stated term if the tenant breaches the lease, the landlord may make
complaint in writing to the District Court of the county where the premises is located if:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0549*

HOUSE BILL 549
1. The tenant breaches the lease;
2. A. The landlord has given the tenant 30 days’ written
notice that the tenant is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to repossess the
leased premises; or
B. The breach of the lease involves behavior by a tenant or a
person who is on the property with the tenant’s consent, which demonstrates a clear and
imminent danger of the tenant or person doing serious harm to themselves, other tenants,
the landlord, the landlord’s property or representatives, or any other person on the property
and the landlord has given the tenant or person in possession 14 days’ written notice that
the tenant or person in possession is in violation of the lease and the landlord desires to
repossess the leased premises; and
3. The tenant or person in actual possession of the premises
refuses to comply.
(ii) The court shall summons immediately the tenant or person in
possession to appear before the court on a day stated in the summons to show cause, if any,
why restitution of the possession of the leased premises should not be made to the landlord.
(2) (i) If, for any reason, the tenant or person in actual possession
cannot be found, the constable or sheriff shall affix an attested copy of the summons
conspicuously on the property.
(ii) After notice is sent to the tenant or person in possession by
first–class mail, the affixing of the summons on the property shall be conclusively presumed
to be a sufficient service to support restitution.
(3) If either of the parties fails to appear before the court on the day stated
in the summons, the court may continue the case for not less than six nor more than 10
days and notify the parties of the continuance.
14–134.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AGRICULTURAL PROPERTY” MEANS PROPERTY THAT IS USED
FOR:
(I) AGRICULTURE, VITICULTURE, AQUACULTURE,
SILVICULTURE, HORTICULTURE, LIVESTOCK, OR EQUINE ACTIVITIES; OR

HOUSE BILL 549 3
(II) FARMING ACTIVITIES FOR THE PRODUCTION OF FOOD OR
FIBER PRODUCTS, INCLUDING PLOWING, TILLAGE, CROPPING, SEEDING,
CULTIVATING, AND HARVESTING.
(3) “RODENT HARBORAGE” MEANS A CONDITION THAT:
(I) PROVIDES SUSTENANCE OR SHELTER FOR MICE OR RATS OR
PROMOTES THEIR REPRODUCTION AND CONTINUED EXISTENCE ON A PROPERTY;
AND
(II) 1. CREATES OR CONTRIBUTES TO PROPERTY DAMAGE;
2. IS INJURIOUS TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, OR THE
WELFARE OF PROPERTY OWNERS; OR
3. OBSTRUCTS THE REASONABLE USE OF PROPERTY.
(B) (1) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A NUISANCE ACTION FOR DAMAGES CAUSED BY RODENT HARBORAGE
ON REAL PROPERTY MAY BE BROUGHT AGAINST:
1. AN OWNER OF THE PROPERTY;
2. AN AGENT OF THE OWNER; OR
3. A PROPERTY MANAGER FOR THE OWNER.
(II) A NUISANCE ACTION MAY NOT BE BROUGHT UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION IF THE RODENT HARBORAGE OCCURS ON PROPERTY THAT IS:
1. ZONED FOR AGRICULTURAL USE; AND
2. ACTUALLY AND PRIMARILY USED AS AGRICULTURAL
PROPERTY.
(2) A LANDLORD MAY BRING AN ACTION UNDER § 8–402.1(A) OF THIS
ARTICLE AGAINST A TENANT FOR BEHAVIOR THAT CAUSES OR CONTRIBUTES TO
RODENT HARBORAGE.
(C) THE COURT MAY AWARD COMPENSATORY DAMAGES, PUNITIVE
DAMAGES, OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF TO A PREVAILING PARTY UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 549
(D) THE RIGHTS AND REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION ARE IN
ADDITION TO ANY OTHER RIGHTS OR REMEDIES THAT MAY EXIST AT LAW OR IN
EQUITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.